Maryland, session 2026, HB0440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–114.2.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AN ENHANCED REIMBURSEMENT
STRUCTURE FOR PROGRAM PROVIDERS THAT DELIVER MEDICAL SERVICES TO
INDIVIDUALS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES.
(B) THE ENHANCED REIMBURSEMENT STRUCTURE ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0440*

HOUSE BILL 440
(1) AUTHORITY FOR THE DEPARTMENT TO SET REIMBURSEMENT
RATES ABOVE STANDARD PROGRAM RATES FOR QUALIFYING SERVICES;
(2) AUTHORITY FOR THE DEPARTMENT TO MAKE RECURRING AND
SUSTAINABLE ADJUSTMENTS TO THE RATES TO SUPPORT PROVIDER ACCESS,
SERVICE CAPACITY, AND CLINICAL QUALITY FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH INTELLECTUAL
AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES; AND
(3) PROVISIONS THAT PRIORITIZE RATE INCREASES FOR SERVICES
THAT REQUIRE ADDITIONAL TIME, COMMUNICATION SUPPORTS, OR SPECIALIZED
CLINICAL TRAINING.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO
IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER THE ENHANCED REIMBURSEMENT STRUCTURE,
INCLUDING PROVIDER ELIGIBILITY CRITERIA AND RATE SCHEDULES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) This Act is contingent on the availability of federal funds through the federal
Health Equity for Adults with Disabilities (HEADs UP) Act or any other federal law or
funding stream supporting health care equity for individuals with intellectual or
developmental disabilities.
(b) The Maryland Department of Health shall consult with the Office of the
Attorney General to determine whether federal funds to implement this section have been
made available through the federal Health Equity for Adults with Disabilities Act or any
other federal law or funding stream described under subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Within 5 days after making the determination that federal funds are available
to implement this Act, the Maryland Department of Health shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services.
(d) If notice of the availability of federal funds is received by the Department of
Legislative Services on or before December 31, 2036, this Act shall take effect on the date
the notice is received by the Department of Legislative Services in accordance with
subsection (c) of this section.
(e) If notice of the availability of federal funds is not received by the Department
of Legislative Services on or before December 31, 2036, this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.